Maryland, session 2025, HB0659.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Insurance
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0659*

HOUSE BILL 659
15–113.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Carrier” means:
(i) an insurer;
(ii) a nonprofit health service plan;
(iii) a health maintenance organization;
(iv) a dental plan organization; or
(v) any other person that provides health benefit plans subject to
regulation by the State.
(3) “Eligible provider” means:
(i) a licensed physician, as defined in § 14–101 of the Health
Occupations Article, who voluntarily participates in a two–sided incentive arrangement; or
(ii) a set of health care practitioners that voluntarily participate in
a two–sided incentive arrangement.
(4) “Health care practitioner” means an individual who is licensed,
certified, or otherwise authorized under the Health Occupations Article to provide health
care services.
(5) “Set of health care practitioners” means:
(i) a group practice;
(ii) a clinically integrated organization established in accordance
with Subtitle 19 of this title;
(iii) an accountable care organization established in accordance with
42 U.S.C. § 1395jjj and any applicable federal regulations; or
(iv) a clinically integrated network that is a provider entity that
meets the criteria established in guidance issued by the Federal Trade Commission,
including a network of behavioral health care programs licensed under § 7.5–401 of the
Health – General Article.
(6) “Two–sided incentive arrangement” means an arrangement between an
eligible provider and a carrier in which the eligible provider may earn an incentive and a

HOUSE BILL 659 3
carrier may recoup funds from the eligible provider in accordance with the terms of a
contract entered into with the eligible provider that meets the requirements of this section.
(f) (1) Under a two–sided incentive arrangement that complies with the
requirements of this section, a carrier may recoup funds paid to an eligible provider based
on the terms of a written contract between the carrier and the eligible provider that at a
minimum:
(i) establish a target budget for:
1. the total cost of care of a population of patients adjusted
for risk and population size; or
2. the cost of an episode of care;
(ii) limit recoupment to not more than 50% of the excess above the
mutually agreed on target established in accordance with item (i) of this paragraph;
(iii) specify a mutually agreed on maximum liability for total
recoupment that may not exceed 10% of the annual payments from the carrier to the eligible
provider;
(iv) provide an opportunity for gains by an eligible provider that is
greater than the opportunity for recoupment by the carrier;
(v) following good faith negotiations, provide an opportunity for an
audit by an independent third party and an independent third–party dispute resolution
process;
(vi) require the carrier and the eligible provider to negotiate in good
faith adjustments to the target budget when:
1. certain circumstances beyond the control of the carrier or
the eligible provider arise, including changes in hospital rates; and
2. material changes occur in health care economics, health
care delivery, or regulations that impact the arrangement; and
(vii) require the carrier to pay any incentive to or request any
recoupment from the eligible provider within 6 months after the end of the contract year,
unless the carrier or eligible provider initiates a dispute relating to the recoupment or
incentive amount.
(2) Unless mutually agreed to by an eligible provider and a carrier, an
arrangement entered into under this subsection may not provide an opportunity for
recoupment by the carrier based on the eligible provider’s performance during the first 12
months of the arrangement.

HOUSE BILL 659
(3) A carrier that enters into a two–sided incentive arrangement with an
eligible provider in which the amount of any payment is determined, in whole or in part,
on the total cost of care of a population of patients or an episode of care, shall, at least
quarterly, disclose to the eligible provider the following information in a manner that meets
federal and State data use and privacy standards:
(i) any amount paid to another health care provider that is included
in the total cost of care of a patient in the population or episode of care; and
(ii) any copayment, coinsurance, or deductible that is included in the
total cost of care of a patient in the population or episode of care.
(4) Unless mutually agreed to by the carrier and eligible provider, a
two–sided incentive arrangement may not be amended during the term of the contract.
(5) A CARRIER MAY NOT IMPOSE A PRIOR AUTHORIZATION, STEP
THERAPY, OR QUANTITY LIMIT REQUIREMENT ON AN ELIGIBLE PROVIDER FOR A
HEALTH CARE SERVICE THAT IS INCLUDED IN A TWO–SIDED INCENTIVE
ARRANGEMENT.
[(5)] (6) The opportunity for independent third–party dispute resolution
provided for in paragraph (1)(v) of this subsection may not be required to be exhausted
before a member or member’s representative is allowed to file an appeal of a coverage
decision under § 15–10D–02 of this title.
[(6)] (7) [Nothing in this] THIS subsection may NOT be construed to:
(i) alter any requirement for a carrier to pay a hospital or related
institution the rate approved by the Health Services Cost Review Commission for hospital
services; or
(ii) supersede the Health Services Cost Review Commission’s
jurisdiction or authority over rate review and approval for hospital services.
15–147.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “TWO–SIDED INCENTIVE ARRANGEMENT” HAS THE
MEANING STATED IN § 15–113 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO:
(1) INSURERS AND NONPROFIT HEALTH SERVICE PLANS THAT
PROVIDE HOSPITAL, MEDICAL, OR SURGICAL BENEFITS TO INDIVIDUALS OR GROUPS
ON AN EXPENSE–INCURRED BASIS UNDER HEALTH INSURANCE POLICIES OR
CONTRACTS THAT ARE ISSUED OR DELIVERED IN THE STATE; AND

HOUSE BILL 659 5
(2) HEALTH MAINTENANCE ORGANIZATIONS THAT PROVIDE
HOSPITAL, MEDICAL, OR SURGICAL BENEFITS TO INDIVIDUALS OR GROUPS UNDER
CONTRACTS THAT ARE ISSUED OR DELIVERED IN THE STATE.
(C) AN ENTITY SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION MAY NOT IMPOSE A PRIOR
AUTHORIZATION, STEP THERAPY, OR QUANTITY LIMIT REQUIREMENT FOR A
HEALTH CARE SERVICE THAT IS INCLUDED IN A TWO–SIDED INCENTIVE
ARRANGEMENT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall apply to all
policies, contracts, and health benefit plans issued, delivered, or renewed in the State on or
after January 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
January 1, 2026.